Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.16.220

Initial and annual reports for secretary of state.

Each domestic corporation, and each foreign corporation registered to transact business in this state, shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing initial and annual reports in accordance with RCW 23.95.255.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2143; 2001 c 307 s 1; 1993 c 290 s 5; 1991 c 72 s 41; 1989 c 165 s 187.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—2001 c 307: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect May 1, 2001." [ 2001 c 307 s 5.]